Mississippi, session 2026, HB656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Special-Purpose Schools Oversight Act of 2026." SECTION 2. (1)  The purpose of this act is to serve Mississippi students who have more intense learning needs but high potential to become proficient in reading, writing, mathematics, and creative problem-solving.  The intent is to increase the number of students who are college and career ready and to strengthen Mississippi's long-term educational and workforce outcomes by addressing the needs of neurodivergent learners and those with specific learning differences. (2)  The Legislature finds that targeted remediation and early intervention for students with learning differences will: (a)  Lower dropout rates among students with learning differences; (b)  Raise graduation rates for students with dyslexia, ADHD, and related learning challenges; (c)  Lower student retention rates for those with reading difficulties; (d)  Increase school attendance and participation among students facing learning challenges; (e)  Reduce overall special education expenditures by remediating foundational learning deficits; (f)  Decrease the number of students requiring long-term special education services; (g)  Reduce behavioral disruptions in schools by addressing underlying learning-related causes; (h)  Raise Mississippi's literacy rates to exceed national literacy averages by intervening with students at risk of retention, underperformance, or low proficiency in reading; and (i)  Support students at higher risk of mental health difficulties that arise as a secondary consequence of under-identification and lack of remediation in acquiring proficient literacy skills. (3)  It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure high-quality, evidence-based and specialized educational opportunities for students with neurodivergent learning profiles and related exceptionalities, including, but not limited to, dyslexia, ADHD, autism spectrum disorder and other specific learning disabilities.  The Legislature recognizes the unique role of Accredited Special-Purpose Schools in providing targeted remediation and intervention that closes learning gaps and supports successful reintegration into general education classrooms. SECTION 3. (1)  There is created the Mississippi Special-Purpose Schools Oversight Board to oversee the authorization, reauthorization and accreditation of all Accredited Special-Purpose Schools serving neurodivergent and exceptional student populations within the State of Mississippi.  The board shall be an independent board of record under the State Department of Education for administrative purposes only. (2)  The board shall be composed of nine (9) voting members appointed as follows: (a)  Three (3) members appointed by the Governor, with one (1) member being from each of the Mississippi Supreme Court Districts, as follows: (i)  One (1) licensed medical doctor with demonstrated expertise or clinical experience in ADHD or related neurodevelopmental conditions; (ii)  One (1) licensed psychologist with professional experience in neurodiversity-related mental health conditions affecting student learning; and (iii)  One (1) board-certified behavior analyst (BCBA) or ASA-trained professional with experience in school-based intervention; (b)  Three (3) members appointed by the State Superintendent of Education, with one (1) member being from each of the Mississippi Supreme Court Districts, as follows: (i)  One (1) certified academic language therapist-qualified instructor (CALT-QI); (ii)  One (1) Speech-language pathologist (SLP) with specialized experience serving students with language-based learning disabilities or autism spectrum disorders; and (iii)  One (1) department subject-matter expert in dyslexia and related disorders, who shall hold CALT credentials; and (c)  Three (3) members appointed jointly by the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, with one (1) member being from each of the Mississippi Supreme Court Districts, as follows: (i)  Two (2) representatives from a currently accredited special-purpose schools demonstrating measurable student growth in remediation outcomes; and (ii)  One (1) member-at-large with a record of advocacy, research or administration in neurodivergent education or remediation programs. In making the appointments, the appointing authority shall ensure diversity of expertise among members of the board required to oversee schools serving neurodivergent populations. (3)  (a)  The initial terms of members of the board shall be as follows: (i)  The initial term of office for the three (3) members appointed by the Governor shall be four (4) years; (ii)  The initial term of office for the three (3) members jointly appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be three (3) years and thereafter shall be three (3) years; and (iii)  The initial term of office for the three (3) members appointed by the State Superintendent of Public Education shall be three (3) years. (b)  Thereafter the term of office of members appointed to the board shall be four (4) years, and members may be reappointed, but in no instance may a member serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.  Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (4)  The board shall meet as soon as practical after September 1, 2026, upon the call of the Governor, and shall organize for business by selecting a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its members, who shall serve an annual term. SECTION 4. (1)  The Mississippi Special-Purpose Schools Oversight Board shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To review, approve, deny, and renew authorizations and accreditations for all accredited special-purpose schools operating within the state; (b)  To establish standards for measurable growth and student progress consistent with the purpose of remediation and reintegration into general education settings; (c)  To monitor school performance data through collaboration with the department's Mississippi Student Information System (MSIS) reporting categories relevant to remediation and progress monitoring; (d)  To establish benchmarks for student growth, remediation effectiveness, and return-to-general-education success rates; (e)  To advise the State Department of Education and the Mississippi Legislature on matters related to the education, remediation and support of neurodivergent learners; (f)  To collaborate with department to develop and update licensing guidelines and professional reporting requirements for individuals serving these populations; (g)  To develop a statewide framework for special-purpose schools whose mission is to provide high-quality remediation closing academic gaps for neurodivergent learners; (h)  To identify effective instructional practices and ensure alignment with state educational standards and federal requirements; and (i)  To provide an annual report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives and State Board of Education summarizing the status, performance and accreditation activities of special-purpose schools. (2)  The board shall have final authority over authorization, reauthorization, and accreditation decisions of special-purpose schools operating under this act, subject only to judicial review as provided by law. (3)  The board may adopt, amend and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions and intent of this act, subject to the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act. SECTION 5. The State Department of Education shall provide administrative and logistical support to the Mississippi Special-Purpose Schools Oversight Board, including, but not limited to, data access, meeting coordination and technical support consistent with maintaining the Board's independent decision-making authority. SECTION 6. (1)  (a)  The Mississippi Special-Purpose Schools Oversight Board shall be funded through annual appropriations made by the Legislature from the General Fund and may also receive grants, donations or federal funds designated for special-purpose or neurodiversity-focused education initiatives. (b)  The State Department of Education shall include the board's operational funding needs as a separate line item in its annual budget submission to the Legislature. (2)  The board may employ an executive director, who shall be responsible for carrying out the policies of the board and managing its daily operations.  The executive director shall serve at the will and pleasure of the board and shall receive compensation as fixed by the board, subject to approval by the State Personnel Board. (3)  The board may employ additional professional, clerical and administrative staff as necessary to perform its functions under this act, subject to the availability of funds and State Personnel Board regulations. (4)  Board members shall receive a per diem in the amount authorized under Section 25-3-69, for each day's attendance at meetings of the board, and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided under Section 25-3-41. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.